Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-202
Barbering, defined.

Any one or any combination of the following practices, when done upon the human body by the use of chemical products for cosmetic or grooming purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments, on any person, other than a member of the immediate family, shall constitute the practice of barbering: (1) Shaving or trimming the beard or cutting the hair; (2) dressing, arranging, styling, curling, waving, straightening, and relaxing of the hair by chemical or mechanical means; (3) giving face and scalp massages or treatment with oils, creams, lotions, or other preparations either by hand, mechanical appliances, or electrical appliances, including the applying of chemical and toiletry preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils, clays, or lotions to scalp, face, neck, or upper part of the body; (4) patterning, fitting, cleaning, styling, coloring, waving, or other similar work upon hair pieces or wigs; and (5) shampooing, bleaching, coloring, rinsing, hair weaving, or similar work upon the hair.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 2, p. 427;

C.S.1929, § 71-2002;

R.S.1943, § 71-202;

Laws 1965, c. 417, § 2, p. 1329;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 4;

Laws 1973, LB 5, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 226, § 2.

Licensed cosmetologist cutting hair of a lady customer of beauty parlor is not a barber within the definition of this section. Lane v. State, 120 Neb. 302, 232 N.W. 96 (1930).